Maryland, session 2026, HB0745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–754.
(a) In this section, “eligible taxpayer” means a resident who, on the last day of the
taxable year, is at least 65 years old.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section [and subject to subsection
(d) of this section], an eligible taxpayer may claim a credit against the State income tax in
an amount equal to:
(1) $1,000 for an eligible taxpayer, other than an individual described
under item (2) of this subsection, whose federal adjusted gross income does not exceed
$100,000; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0745*

HOUSE BILL 745
(2) for spouses filing a joint return or for a surviving spouse or head of
household as defined in § 2 of the Internal Revenue Code whose federal adjusted gross
income does not exceed $150,000:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item, $1,750; or
(ii) if only one of the individuals filing the joint return is an eligible
taxpayer, $1,000.
(c) For a taxable year in which the September General Fund estimate for the
current fiscal year in the September Board of Revenue Estimates report issued during the
taxable year is more than 3.75% below the March General Fund estimate for the current
fiscal year in the March Board of Revenue Estimates report issued in the taxable year, the
amount of the credit allowed under subsection (b) of this section is limited to:
(1) $500 for an eligible taxpayer, other than an individual described under
item (2) of this subsection, whose federal adjusted gross income is at least $50,000 but does
not exceed $100,000; or
(2) for spouses filing a joint return or for a surviving spouse or head of
household as defined in § 2 of the Internal Revenue Code whose federal adjusted gross
income is at least $100,000 but does not exceed $150,000:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item, $875; or
(ii) if only one of the individuals filing the joint return is an eligible
taxpayer, $500.
(d) If the credit allowed under this section in [any] A taxable year exceeds the
State income tax for that taxable year, the [unused amount of the credit may not be carried
over to any other taxable year] ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM A REFUND IN THE
AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.